Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.025

County auditor.

"County auditor" means the county auditor in a noncharter county or the officer, irrespective of title, having the overall responsibility to maintain voter registration and to conduct state and local elections in a charter county.

[ 2003 c 111 s 105; 1984 c 106 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.01.043.]